Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1435.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The act of June 13, 1967 (P.L.31, No.21), known as the Human Services Code, is amended by adding a section to read:Section 443.16. Payments for Extraordinary Personal Care Services.--(a) The department shall seek a waiver from the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services of the United States Department of Health and Human Services to permit payment for extraordinary personal care services provided by a legally responsible relative to a Medical Assistance recipient when the personal care service is a covered service. The department shall implement this section subject to Federal approval.(b) The Legislative Budget and Finance Committee shall 12345678910111213141516171819 conduct a study to review the costs to the Commonwealth of the implementation of any waiver under subsection (a) that occurs during the two-year period after the waiver is approved. Within three years of the implementation of a waiver under subsection (a), the Legislative Budget and Finance Committee shall issue a report containing the findings of the study to the following:(1) The Governor.(2) The chairperson and minority chairperson of the Health and Human Services Committee of the Senate.(3) The chairperson and minority chairperson of the Health Committee of the House of Representatives.(4) The chairperson and minority chairperson of the Human Services Committee of the House of Representatives.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 180 days.20250HB1435PN1671 - 2 - 1234567891011121314